District of Columbia statutes.
24-211.22

Employee testing.

(a)

The following Department employees shall be tested for drug and alcohol use:

(1)

Applicants;

(2)

Those employees who have had a reasonable suspicion referral;

(3)

Post-accident employees, as soon as reasonably possible after the accident; and

(4)

HPR employees.

(b)

Only HPR employees shall be subject to random testing.

(c)

Employees shall be given at least a 30-day written notice from September 20, 1996, that the Department is implementing a drug and alcohol testing program and shall be given an opportunity to seek treatment. Following September 20, 1996, the Department shall procure a testing vendor and testing shall be implemented as described herein.

History

Sept. 20, 1996, D.C. Law 11-158, § 3, 43 DCR 3702

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-448.2.

Temporary Addition of Section

Temporary addition of subchapter: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 24-211.21.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 24-211.21.